Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The polka, a dance originating in the middle of the 19th
century that exemplifies the spirit of the residents of Kansas, is hereby
designated as the official dance of the state of Kansas.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.